Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.260

Indeterminate sentence review board—Supervision of conditionally pardoned persons—Hearing.

(1) The indeterminate sentence review board shall, when requested by the governor, pass on the representations made in support of applications for pardons for convicted persons and make recommendations thereon to the governor.

(2) It will be the duty of the secretary of corrections to exercise supervision over such convicted persons as have been conditionally pardoned by the governor, to the end that such persons shall faithfully comply with the conditions of such pardons. The indeterminate sentence review board shall also pass on any representations made in support of applications for restoration of civil rights of convicted persons, and make recommendations to the governor. The department of corrections shall prepare materials and make investigations requested by the indeterminate sentence review board in order to assist the board in passing on the representations made in support of applications for pardon or for the restoration of civil rights.

(3) The board shall make no recommendations to the governor in support of an application for pardon until a public hearing has been held under this section or RCW 9.94A.885(3) upon the application. The prosecuting attorney of the county where the conviction was obtained shall be notified at least thirty days prior to the scheduled hearing that an application for pardon has been filed and the date and place at which the hearing on the application for pardon will be held. The board may waive the thirty-day notice requirement in cases where it determines that waiver is necessary to permit timely action on the petition. A copy of the application for pardon shall be sent to the prosecuting attorney. The prosecuting attorney shall make reasonable efforts to notify victims, survivors of victims, witnesses, and the law enforcement agency or agencies that conducted the investigation of the date and place of the hearing. Information regarding victims, survivors of victims, or witnesses receiving this notice are confidential and shall not be available to the offender. The board shall consider written, oral, audio, or videotaped statements regarding the application for pardon received, personally or by representation, from the individuals who receive notice pursuant to this section. This subsection is intended solely for the guidance of the board. Nothing in this section is intended or may be relied upon to create a right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at law by any person.

[ 1999 c 323 s 4; 1999 c 143 s 29; 1981 c 136 s 44; 1979 c 141 s 9; 1967 c 134 s 14; 1935 c 114 s 7; RRS s 10249-7.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1999 c 143 s 29 and by 1999 c 323 s 4, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Intent—1999 c 323: See note following RCW 9.94A.885.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.